src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! !!!Skolt Saami noun morphology 

!! This file documents the Skolt Saami noun morphology, lexicon by lexicon.

!! !!Unclassified words

LEXICON N_ !!= * @CODE@ FOR (STILL) UNCLASSIFIED INCOMING NOUNS.
+N+WORK: #;

!! IRREGULAR NOUN nijdd
LEXICON N_NIJDD !!= * @CODE@ nijdd:ni
+N: NMN_NIJDD ;
LEXICON	NMN_NIJDD	!!= * @CODE@ nijdd:ni
!! ** Yaml: __N-nijdd__
:jdd ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;		!!= * @CODE@ nijdd
:jdd SG-NOM ;			!!= * @CODE@ nijdd
:jdd%>â ESS/PAR ; 	  		!!= * @CODE@ nijddân, nijddâd
!! strong_geminate, short_vowel, palatalization
:jdd%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;		!!= * @CODE@ niõʹđ
!! strong_geminate, long_vowel
:õđ SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;	!!= * @CODE@ niõđ
:õđ%>â SG-LOC ;		!!= * @CODE@ niõđâst
:õđ SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;	!!= * @CODE@ niõđ, niõđid, niõđid, niõđin, niõđivuiʹm, niõđitaa

+Der/Dimin+N:õđ N_MUÕRÂŽ-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ niõđ-
+Der/Dimin+N:õđ%^PAL N_MUÕRÂŽ-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ niõʹđ-

:jdd HatÂ-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
:õđ HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ;
:õđ HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_NG ;
:õđ HatÂ-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;
:õđ HatÂ-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;



!! CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION NOMINALS
LEXICON N_PAPP !!= * @CODE@ papp:papp
!! similar_to: N_PẸSS
+N:  NMN_PAPP ;
LEXICON NMN_PAPP
!! Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_short:vow_high:pal_no:cns_gem
!!! pos="nominal"
!!! syll_count-in-Sg_Nom="1"
!!! stem-ends-in="consonant"
!!! stem_vowel-in-Sg_Loc="â"
!!! stem_with_gradation="yes" 
!! 1.1.1.1.1.1. Sg_Nom="short_vowel|geminate" Sg_Gen="long_vowel|geminate" 

! foot: 2syll
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: no
! consonant: geminate
! gradation: yes2
! weak_grade: no
! strong_grade:	geminate
! stem_vowel-in-Sg_Loc: âst
! Sg.Ill: palatalization-AND-e
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
!! !!1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
!! !!  â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
!! !!1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!! !!  Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Not Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!    Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Strong grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! ** Yaml: __N-papp__
!! strong_geminate, short_vowel
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;		!!= * @CODE@ papp
: SG-NOM ;			!!= * @CODE@ papp
:%>â ESS/PAR ; 	  		!!= * @CODE@ pappân, pappâd
!! strong_geminate, short_vowel, palatalization
:%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;		!!= * @CODE@ paʹppe
+Der/N2A:%^PAL N2A_LUÕʹSSI ;		!!= * @CODE@ N»A: paʹppi

!! strong_geminate, long_vowel
:%^V2VV SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;	!!= * @CODE@ paapp
:%^V2VV%>â SG-LOC ;		!!= * @CODE@ paappâst
:%^V2VV SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;	!!= * @CODE@ paappi, paappid, paappid, paappin, paappivuiʹm, paappitaa

+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV N_MUÕRÂŽ-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paapp-
+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL N_MUÕRÂŽ-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paaʹpp-

HatÂ-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
:%^V2VV HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ; !! e.g. 
:%^V2VV HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_NG ; !! e.g. +Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxSg3
 HatÂ-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !! e.g. +Sg+Loc+PxSg1
 HatÂ-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;

LEXICON N_PAPP-PL
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;          !!= * @CODE@ papp
:%^V2VV PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ paapp
:%^V2VV PL-OBL ;      !!= * @CODE@ paappi, paappid, paappid, paappin, paappivuiʹm, paappitaa
:%>â ESS/PAR ;                  !!= * @CODE@ pappân, pappâd
 HatÂ-STEM-PX-RETAIN-PL ;
:%^V2VV HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN-PL ;
 HatÂ-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-ESS ;


LEXICON N_PODD !!= * @CODE@ podd:podd
+N:  NMN_PODD ;
LEXICON NMN_PODD
!! Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_short:vow_high:pal_no:cns_gem_dd_type
!!! pos="nominal"
!!! syll_count-in-Sg_Nom="1"
!!! stem-ends-in="consonant"
!!! stem_vowel-in-Sg_Loc="â"
!!! stem_with_gradation="yes" 
!! 1.1.1.1.1.1. Sg_Nom="short_vowel|geminate" Sg_Gen="long_vowel|geminate" 

!! similar_to: N_KÕÕDDÂS
!! !!FORMS
!! ** Yaml: __N-podd__
!! 
NMN_PAPP ;

LEXICON N_VILLJ !!= * @CODE@ villj:villj
+N: NMN_VILLJ ;
LEXICON NMN_VILLJ
!! Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_short:vow_high:pal_no:cns_gem_llj_type

!! !!FORMS
!! ** Yaml: __N-villj__
!! is for nouns with -âst Loc. N_Â-EPal2-21
 NMN_PAPP ;


LEXICON N_PÕRTT !!= * @CODE@ põrtt:põrtt
+N: NMN_PÕRTT ;
LEXICON NMN_PÕRTT
!! Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_short:vow_high:pal_no:cns_xyy
!! similar_to: N_TAALKÂS, N_KOONTÂR
!!! pos="nominal"
!!! syll_count-in-Sg_Nom="1"
!!! stem-ends-in="consonant"
!!! stem_vowel-in-Sg_Loc="â"
!!! stem_with_gradation="yes" 
!! 1.1.1.1.1.1. Sg_Nom="short_vowel|long_cluster" Sg_Gen="long_vowel|short_cluster" 

! foot: 2syll
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: no
! consonant: cluster
! gradation: yes2
! weak_grade: short
! strong_grade: long
! stem_vowel-in-Sg_Loc: âst
! Sg.Ill: palatalization-AND-e
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
!! !!1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
!! !!  â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
!! !!1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!! !!  Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Not Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!    Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! ** Yaml: __N-portt__
!! 
 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;				!!= * @CODE@ põrtt
: SG-NOM ;	    				!!= * @CODE@ põrtt
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;		!!= * @CODE@ põõrt
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY PL-NOM ;		!!= * @CODE@ põõrt
:%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;		      		!!= * @CODE@ põʹrtte
+Der/N2A:%^PAL N2A_LUÕʹSSI ;		      	!!= * @CODE@ põʹrtti
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY%>â SG-LOC ;			!!= * @CODE@ põõrtâst
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY SG-COM_IN ;			!!= * @CODE@ põõrtin
:%>â ESS/PAR ; 		  			!!= * @CODE@ põrttân
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY PL-OBL ;			!!= * @CODE@ põõrti

+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY N_MUÕRÂŽ-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ põõrt-
+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL%^XYY2XY N_MUÕRÂŽ-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ põõʹrt-

HatÂ-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ;
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_NG ;
:%^XYY2XY HatÂ-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;
: HatÂ-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;

LEXICON N_PÕRTT-PL !!= * @CODE@ põõrt:põrtt
+N: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;                           !!= * @CODE@ põrtt
+N:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY PL-NOM ;                !!= * @CODE@ põõrt
+N:%>â ESS/PAR ;                                  !!= * @CODE@ põrttân
+N:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY PL-OBL ;                        !!= * @CODE@ põõrti

!!!
LEXICON N_AUTT !!= * @CODE@ autt:autt
+N: NMN_AUTT ;
