src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N-INCOMING
kõbbkõʒʒ:kõbbkõ%^1VOWʒˈʒ N_PODD ;
aicc:a%^1VOWicc N_AUTT ;
altteemkurss:altteemku%^1VOWrss N_PÕRTT ;
anfaŋŋ:anfa%^1VOWŋŋ N_PAPP ;
atompomm:atompo%^1VOWmm N_PAPP ;
auʹrrjemautt:auʹrrjem#a%^1VOWutt N_AUTT ;
aʹŋŋ:aʹŋŋ N_ ;
bauksitt:bauksi%^1VOWtt N_PAPP ;
ceerkavmusikk:ceerkavmusi%^1VOWkk N_PAPP ;
cuõptts:cuõptts N_ ;
deodorantt:deodora%^1VOWntt N_PÕRTT ;
domm-mašinakaupp:domm-mašinaka%^1VOWupp N_AUTT ;
eeʹmilieʹđđitukk:eeʹmilieʹđˈđitu%^1VOWkk N_PAPP ;
fabrikk:fabri%^1VOWkk N_PAPP ;
fakss:fa%^1VOWkss N_PÕRTT ;
foosfor:foosfor N_ ;
fuʹntt:fu%^1VOWʹntt N_PÕRTT ;
grafikk:grafi%^1VOWkk N_PAPP ;
haajjaicc:haajja%^1VOWicc N_AUTT ;
heäʹrvvmall:heäʹrvv#ma%^1VOWll N_PAPP ;
hoiʹddjemtarbb:hoiʹddjemta%^1VOWrbb N_PÕRTT ;
huäpp:huäpp N_ ;
huʹvddjemkaupp:huʹvddjemka%^1VOWupp N_AUTT ;
håiddjempõrtt:håiddjem#põ%^1VOWrtt N_PÕRTT ;
innpoojâstrafikk:innpoojâstrafi%^1VOWkk N_PAPP ;
intressjoukk:intressjo%^1VOWukk N_AUTT ;
jeännamiʹʒʒe:jeännamiʹʒʒe N_ ;
jeäʹǧǧooll:jeäʹǧǧ#o%^1VOWll N_PAPP-PL ;
jieʹllemkorgg:jieʹllemko%^1VOWrgg N_PÕRTT ;
jieʹttvaull:jieʹttva%^1VOWull N_AUTT ;
jiõnâânnemteknikk:jiõnâânnemtekni%^1VOWkk N_PAPP ;
joukkpõrtt:joukk#põ%^1VOWrtt N_PÕRTT ;
jueʹǩǩi:jueʹǩǩi N_ ;
juukkâmodd:juukkâm#o%^1VOWdd N_PAPP ;
jäuʹrrnjormm:jäuʹrrnjo%^1VOWrmm N_PÕRTT ;
jäävvteʹmteknikk:jäävvteʹmtekni%^1VOWkk N_PAPP ;
kaaidâš:kaaidâš N_ ;
karttlõstt:kartt#lõ%^1VOWstt N_PÕRTT ;
kass:ka%^1VOWss N_PAPP ;
komppan:komppan N_ ;
koontârpõrtt:koontâr#põ%^1VOWrtt N_PÕRTT ;
krambodd:krambo%^1VOWdd N_PAPP ;
kruunvoudd:kruunvo%^1VOWudd N_AUTT ;
kueʹllkâlmmem:kueʹllkâlmmem N_ ;
kueʹllšeeʹllemnjargg:kueʹllšeeʹllemnja%^1VOWrgg N_PÕRTT ;
kueʹrmmautt:kueʹrmma%^1VOWutt N_AUTT ;
kuâmmaniʒʒe:kuâmmaniʒʒe N_ ;
kuõbbârpodd:kuõbˈbârpo%^1VOWdd N_PAPP ;
kuʹccerollsauʒʒ:kuʹccerollsa%^1VOWuʒʒ N_AUTT ;
kuʹstt:ku%^1VOWʹstt N_PÕRTT ;
kââuʹr-:kââuʹr- N_ ;
kåʹddveʹrǧǧpõrtt:kåʹddveʹrǧǧ#põ%^1VOWrtt N_PÕRTT ;
kåʹšǩǩvueʹǯǯ:kåʹšǩǩvueʹǯˈǯ N_ ;
leikktaull:leikkta%^1VOWull N_AUTT ;
lieʹđđilõstt:lieʹđđi#lõ%^1VOWstt N_PÕRTT ;
liikkeeʹes:liikkeeʹes N_ ;
liâdggfabrikk:liâdggfabri%^1VOWkk N_PAPP ;
loppkonsertt:loppkonse%^1VOWrtt N_PÕRTT ;
läinnkorgg:läinnko%^1VOWrgg N_PÕRTT ;
lääʹnnj:lääʹnnj N_ ;
mainstemjoukk:mainstemjo%^1VOWukk N_AUTT ;
matematikk:matemati%^1VOWkk N_PAPP ;
mašinairauʹddipõrtt:mašinairauʹddi#põ%^1VOWrtt N_PÕRTT ;
maʹhssi:maʹhssi N_ ;
miršš:mi%^1VOWršš N_PÕRTT ;
mittar:mittar N_ ;
miârkkääiʹjpodd:miârkkääiʹjpo%^1VOWdd N_PAPP ;
miârrnijdd:miârr#ni N_NIJDD ;
muummnijdd:muumm#ni N_NIJDD ;
muâlas:muâlas N_ ;
muʹttemtaull:muʹttemta%^1VOWull N_AUTT ;
mâŋŋvardd:mâŋŋva%^1VOWrdd N_PÕRTT ;
mättʼtem-mall:mättʼtem-ma%^1VOWll N_PAPP ;
måʹǩǩreäiʹǧǧ:måʹǩǩreäiʹǧǧ N_ ;
narodjoukk:narod#jo%^1VOWukk N_AUTT ;
niõđnijdd:niõđ#ni N_NIJDD ;
njiõrrpeäʹles:njiõrrpeäʹles N_ ;
njääʹlmtiudd:njääʹlmti%^1VOWudd N_AUTT ;
normm:no%^1VOWrmm N_PÕRTT ;
nuõrroummu:nuõrroummu N_ ;
obbžurr:obbžu%^1VOWrr N_PAPP ;
ooccâmjoukk:ooccâmjo%^1VOWukk N_AUTT ;
oukk:o%^1VOWukk N_AUTT ;
paarcttem:paarcttem N_ ;
pass:pa%^1VOWss N_PAPP ;
peldd:pe%^1VOWldd N_PÕRTT ;
peäʹcǩǩeemruuʹd:peäʹcǩǩeemruuʹd N_ ;
peäʹsslaukk:peäʹsˈsla%^1VOWukk N_AUTT ;
pieʹcchutt:pieʹcchu%^1VOWtt N_PAPP ;
pistol:pistol N_ ;
poll:poll N_PAPP ;
porggi:porggi N_ ;
porrmõšlaukk:porrmõšla%^1VOWukk N_AUTT ;
posliintiskk:posliinti%^1VOWskk N_PÕRTT ;
pââʹldespodd:pââʹldes#po%^1VOWdd N_PAPP ;
pâʹjjkonstaapel:pâʹjjkonstaapel N_ ;
päkkhuʹvddjemkaupp:päkkhuʹvddjemka%^1VOWupp N_AUTT ;
pääʹrn-nijdd:pääʹrn-#ni N_NIJDD ;
påålaspõlvv:påålas#põ%^1VOWlvv N_PÕRTT ;
pååʹlesautt:pååʹlesa%^1VOWutt N_AUTT ;
rall:ra%^1VOWll N_PAPP ;
rallautt:ralla%^1VOWutt N_AUTT ;
reznkakoođviõmâr:reznka#koođ#viõmâr N_ ;
riskk-kapitalfondd:riskk-kapitalfo%^1VOWndd N_PÕRTT ;
risttnijdd:ristt#ni N_NIJDD ;
rosttovnijdd:rosttov#ni N_NIJDD ;
ručč:ru%^1VOWčč N_PAPP ;
räiddvaunn:räiddva%^1VOWunn N_AUTT ;
råʹpp-pieʹǩǩ:råʹpp-#pieʹǩˈǩ N_ ;
saftt:sa%^1VOWftt N_PÕRTT ;
seʹrddempodd:seʹrddempo%^1VOWdd N_PAPP ;
sniimmâmkaupp:sniimmâmka%^1VOWupp N_AUTT ;
snuõrddem:snuõrddem N_ ;
spesiaaljoukk:spesiaaljo%^1VOWukk N_AUTT ;
spesiaalpuõccipõrtt:spesiaalpuõcci#põ%^1VOWrtt N_PÕRTT ;
stukk:stu%^1VOWkk N_PAPP ;
särnnamterapeutt:särnnamterape%^1VOWutt N_AUTT ;
säuʹnnlaaudâš:säuʹnnlaaudâš N_ ;
sääʹmnijdd:sääʹm#ni N_NIJDD ;
säʹrǧǧstukk:säʹrǧǧstu%^1VOWkk N_PAPP ;
tabdd:ta%^1VOWbdd N_PÕRTT ;
terapeutt:terape%^1VOWutt N_AUTT ;
teâtt-taull:teâtt-ta%^1VOWull N_AUTT ;
teäʹǧǧvaajtempodd:teäʹǧǧ#vaajtem#po%^1VOWdd N_PAPP ;
trieʹjj:trieʹjj N_ ;
tueʹlespodd:tueʹlespo%^1VOWdd N_PAPP ;
tukkpõrtt:tukk#põ%^1VOWrtt N_PÕRTT ;
täʹvvervaunn:täʹvverva%^1VOWunn N_AUTT ;
uuʹlecteaʹtter:uuʹlec#teaʹtter N_ ;
valutt:valu%^1VOWtt N_PAPP ;
vantt:va%^1VOWntt N_PÕRTT ;
virkkõõvvâmǩeäinn:virkkõõvvâmǩeäinn N_ ;
vueʹlljååʹttem-mostt:vueʹlljååʹttem-mo%^1VOWstt N_PÕRTT ;
vuässõskaupp:vuässõs#ka%^1VOWupp N_AUTT ;
vuõltteemkonfeârtt:vuõltteemkonfeârtt N_ ;
väinnpodd:väinnpo%^1VOWdd N_PAPP ;
âʹbrrpõlvv:âʹbrrpõ%^1VOWlvv N_PÕRTT ;
äiʹǧǧtaull:äiʹǧǧta%^1VOWull N_AUTT ;
äʹcclokk:äʹcclo%^1VOWkk N_PAPP ;
ååuʹces:ååuʹces N_ ;
åʹrjjkaupp:åʹrjjka%^1VOWupp N_AUTT ;
čipp:či%^1VOWpp N_PAPP ;
čormm:čo%^1VOWrmm N_PÕRTT ;
čuõškksueʹǧǧ:čuõškksueʹǧˈǧ N_ ;
škooul-laukk:škooul-la%^1VOWukk N_AUTT ;
šõddeemvalmštõõttâmkurss:šõddeemvalmštõõttâmku%^1VOWrss N_PÕRTT ;
šõkknemodd:šõkknem#o%^1VOWdd N_PAPP ;
ǩeäđam:ǩeäđam N_ ;
ǩeʹrjjautt:ǩeʹrjja%^1VOWutt N_AUTT ;
ǩilomettarčiõkk-kõskk:ǩilomettarčiõkk-kõ%^1VOWskk N_PÕRTT ;
ǩiõttlaukk:ǩiõttla%^1VOWukk N_AUTT ;
